Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.290

Powers relative to parks and parkways.

If a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to perform the function of metropolitan parks and parkways, it shall have the following powers in addition to the general powers granted by this chapter:

(1) To prepare a comprehensive plan of metropolitan parks and parkways.

(2) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift or grant, to lease, construct, add to, improve, develop, replace, repair, maintain, operate and regulate the use of metropolitan parks and parkways, together with all lands, rights-of-way, property, equipment and accessories necessary therefor. A park or parkway shall be considered to be a metropolitan facility if the metropolitan council shall by resolution find it to be of use and benefit to all or a major portion of the residents of the metropolitan area. Parks or parkways which are owned by a component city or county may be acquired or used by the metropolitan municipal corporation only with the consent of the legislative body of such city or county. Cities and counties are hereby authorized to convey or lease such facilities to metropolitan municipal corporations or to contract for their joint use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between the legislative bodies of such city or county and the metropolitan council, without submitting the matter to the voters of such city or county. If parks or parkways which have been acquired or used as metropolitan facilities shall no longer be used for park purposes by the metropolitan municipal corporation, such facilities shall revert to the component city or county which formerly owned them.

(3) To fix fees and charges for the use of metropolitan park and parkway facilities.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.58.290. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 29.]